Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.910

Saving—Civil, criminal proceedings.

Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this chapter, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the *effective date of this chapter.

[ 1959 c 282 s 63.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "effective date of this chapter" is midnight June 10, 1959, see preface 1959 session laws.